src/morphology/stems/altstem-nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_HÄKKYRÄ
!! € häkkyrä
!! € häkkyrää
!! € häkkyränä
!! € häkkyröinä
!! € häkkyröitä
0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!LEXICON N_RAKUUNA
! Certain trisyllabic or longer a stems allow a lot of allomorphs and both
! 0: o : 0 variations:
! rakuuna
! rakuunoita
! rakuunoja
! rakuunoiden
! rakuunoitten
! rakuunojen
! rakuunoihin
! Also less commonly
! rakuunain
!0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!0:o   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
!0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
!0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
!0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
!0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
!0:o     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
!0:o     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
!0:o     N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
!0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
!0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
!0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
!0:o   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
!0:o   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
!0:o   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
!0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_SIIVILÄ
!! € mörinä
!! € mörinää
!! € mörinänä
!! € mörinässä
0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LUSIKKA
!! 0: o stem variation combines with trisyllabic class of special illatives
!! € lusikka
!! € lusikkoina
!! € lusikoissa
!! € lusikkoihin
!! € lusikoihin
0:ka   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ko   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ka   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:ko   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:ko   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:ko     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:ko     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko     N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ka   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:ko   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ka   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_KÄMMEKKÄ
!! € kämmekkä
!! € kämmeköihin
!! € kämmekköihin
0:kä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0:kö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
0:kö     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
0:kö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0:kö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:kö     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:kä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:ö     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kö     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:kä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_ULAPPA
!! 0: o stem variation combines with trisyllabic class of special illatives
!! € ulappa
!! € ulappoina
!! € ulapoissa
!! € ulappoihin
!! € ulapoihin
0:pa   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:po   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pa   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:pa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:po   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:po   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:po     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:po     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:po     N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:po   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:pa   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_POHATTA
!! 0: o stem variation combines with trisyllabic class of special illatives
!! € pohatta
!! € pohattoina
!! € pohatoissa
!! € pohattoihin
!! € pohatoihin
0:ta   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:to   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o   N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:ta   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0:to   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:to   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:to     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0:to     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:to     N_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:ta   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:to   N_COMPOUND_JEN ;
0:ta   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_SOKEA
!! € sokea
!! € sokeana
!! € sokeina
!! € sokeissa
!! € sokeihin
!! € sokeisiin
0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LIPEÄ
!! € lipeä
!! € lipeänä
!! € lipeinä
!! € lipeissä
!! € lipeihin
!! € lipeisiin
0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä      ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN     ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_VANHEMPI
!! € vanhempi
!! € vanhempana
!! € vanhemmassa
!! € vanhempina
!! € vanhemmista
0:pi  N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:pa  N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:ma  N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:p   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:m    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:pi  N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;
0:pi  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:p    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:p    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:pi  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ma  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mpa   N_COMPOUND_IN ; ! type 'vanhempain-' is commoner than -in usually
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pa  N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_VAINAA
!! € vapaa
0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TIENOO
!! € tienoo
0:o   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:o   N_BACK_SINGULARS ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_LEIKKUU
!! € kerjuu
0:u   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:u   N_BACK_SINGULARS ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:u   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:u   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_MAA
!! € maa
0:a   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:a   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:a   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HAN    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TEE
!! € tee
0:e   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:e   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:e   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:e   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_HAI
!! € hai
0:i   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:i   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:i   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PII
!! € hai
0:i   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:i   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:i   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HIN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_OOKOO
!! € ookoo
0:o   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:o   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:o   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:o   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HON    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PUU
!! € puu
0:u   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:u   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:u   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
0:u   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_HUN    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PYY
!! € pyy
0:y   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:y   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:y   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:y   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HYN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:y   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:y   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PÄÄ
!! € pää
0:ä   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÄN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_KÖÖ
!! € köö
0:ö   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ö   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HÖN    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TIE
!! € tie
0:ie  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:ie  N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ie  N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0:ie  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_HEN    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ie  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ie  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
